Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 30.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201023-1832
Organ and tissue
donations; immunity from criminal liability.

A coroner, a coroner's
designee, a coroner's
physician or his or her designee, a facility
at which an organ or tissue recovery took place pursuant to sections 23-1825
to 23-1832, any authorized
recovery personnel, or any other
person who acts in good faith in compliance with sections 23-1825 to 23-1832
shall be immune from criminal liability for recovery of any organ or tissue.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 30.